test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-3-nîtim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - nîtim : :

      # Core

      # Poss
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nîtimom   #  my cross-cousin
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kîtimom   #  your cross-cousin
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: wîtimoma   #  his/her other cross-cousin(s)
      

      # Der/Dim
      nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Sg: nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Sg   #  a little cross-cousin
      

      # Poss # Sg
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nîtimom   #  my cross-cousin
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kîtimom   #  your cross-cousin
      
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nîtimominân   #  our cross-cousin
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px12Pl+Sg: kîtimominaw   #  your and our cross-cousin
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kîtimomiwâw   #  your cross-cousin
      
      
      nîtim+N+A+D+PxX+Sg: nîtim+N+A+D+PxX+Sg   #  someone's cross-cousin
      

      # Poss # Pl
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nîtimomak   #  my cross-cousins
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kîtimomak   #  your cross-cousins
      
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nîtimominânak   #  our cross-cousins
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px12Pl+Pl: kîtimominawak   #  your and our cross-cousins
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kîtimomiwâwak   #  your cross-cousins
      
      
      nîtim+N+A+D+PxX+Pl: nîtim+N+A+D+PxX+Pl   #  someone's cross-cousins
      

      # Poss # Obv
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: nîtimoma   #  my other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kîtimoma   #  your other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: wîtimoma   #  his/her other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: nîtimominâna   #  our other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px12Pl+Obv: kîtimominawa   #  your and our other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kîtimomiwâwa   #  your other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: wîtimomiwâwa   #  their other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: wîtimomithiwa   #  another's/others' other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+PxX+Obv: nîtim+N+A+D+PxX+Obv   #  someone's other cross-cousin(s)
      
